Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Miscellaneous Products

260.960.
Aquaculture.

The General Assembly recognizes the importance of aquaculture to the agricultural economy of the state.

“Aquaculture” means the science, art, and business of producing and raising aquatic organisms under controlled or semicontrolled conditions.

The State Department of Agriculture shall promote the development of markets for aquacultural products. The department shall work cooperatively with Kentucky State University’s aquaculture program utilizing its expertise in the area of aquaculture. The department also shall work cooperatively with other state agencies in assisting aquaculture producers to obtain the necessary permits.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 7, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 3, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 265, § 2, effective August 1, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 3 and 265 which are identical and have been codified together.